Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF577.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2540SV (2) 91 as/js S.F. 577 Section 1. Section 716.11, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. A telecommunications or service, information service, 3 or cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Â§153, a wireless 4 service as defined in section 8C.2, or a broadband generation, 5 transmission, or delivery system. 6